public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
arear/A
albexar/A
raƚegrar/A
realsar/A
‘ndar/A
angaredar/A
arxentar/A
ardinar/A
aromatiđar/A
asiar/A
aseƚerar/A
augurar/A
regaver/A
badar/A
bagoƚar/A
bakaɉar/A
trabaƚar/A
balbetar/A
xbalinar/A
balotar/A
xbalŧar/A
bandidar/A
xbanpoƚar/A
inbaraŧar/A
inbarbotar/A
inbaronar/A
bastardar/A
batidar/A
baŧilar/A
bavar/A
xbaxir/A
rebekar/A
xbendar/A
inbestialir/A
bevaŧar/A
biankiđar/A
xbigatar/A
konbinar/A
inbiondir/A
biskolar/A
xbixigoƚar/A
sobóɉer/A
xbojentar/A
inbokonar/A
inbolsamar/A
bonaŧar/A
dexbonigoƚar/A
bordexar/A
xboroŧar/A
boteđar/A
inbotonar/A
inboŧolar/A
brakeđar/A
bragoƚar/A
sbrankar/A
inbraŧolar/A
xbrenar/A
brikonar/A
broɉar/A
brokolar/A
inbroxar/A
inbrunir/A
xbueƚar/A
burlar/A
inbutiƚiar/A
inbuxerar/A
scansar/A
casar/A
celerar/A
ocèñer/A
mancéñer/A
cibar/A
scokar/A
incukar/A
redir/A
daŧiar/A
dentar/A
determinar/A
dialogar/A
dexdíxer/A
dixnar/A
doler/A
radolŧir/A
kondonar/A
dexdorar/A
adotar/A
radresar/A
dulkorar/A
inxaƚar/A
đavaɉar/A
xenerar/A
xogatolar/A
adónxer/A
raxónxer/A
dovar/A
xugatoƚar/A
sperđurar/A
inedukar/A
eƚèxer/A
riensir/A
exalar/A
rarefar/A
defalkar/A
fameliaridar/A
fataƚixar/A
anplifegar/A
verifegar/A
proferir/A
arfiar/A
infibiar/A
refiƚar/A
fiondar/A
fiskalidar/A
desfogar/A
sfondar/A
informajar/A
straforsar/A
frànxer/A
fratonar/A
refreskar/A
infroƚir/A
fulmenar/A
futurixar/A
galeđar/A
ingalusar/A
garbelar/A
xgaruɉar/A
xgianŧar/A
gongolar/A
graduar/A
xgranfar/A
ingravar/A
gretoƚar/A
ingriñoƚir/A
grongoƚar/A
guŧar/A
xguindoƚar/A
imaxinar/A
injuriar/A
intimar/A
reiterar/A
jasar/A
inɉemar/A
inɉòter/A
jubilar/A
deskaenar/A
skaldar/A
kaƚomar/A
skaƚumar/A
kandidar/A
deskantar/A
kapitar/A
karamelar/A
skarnevalar/A
inkarteƚar/A
katar/A
inkatorigolar/A
prekavar/A
inkaxinar/A
arkòɉer/A
skolar/A
komensar/A
konfesar/A
konseƚiar/A
konsar/A
perkórer/A
inakòrder/A
skoroŧar/A
koŧar/A
kòxer/A
skrikar/A
skrostar/A
rekuadrar/A
deskuèrder/A
rekuƚar/A
skurŧar/A
lanbikar/A
laorar/A
traƚasar/A
leamar/A
legalidar/A
ƚeterar/A
ekuiƚibrar/A
delimar/A
lisensiar/A
xlojar/A
loxar/A
deluviar/A
magonar/A
mamaƚukar/A
manipoƚar/A
marcar/A
martirixar/A
inmaskerar/A
inmaŧar/A
destramedar/A
inmeƚar/A
meraveɉar/A
introméter/A
militar/A
mobiliar/A
xmokolar/A
mondar/A
demoraƚixar/A
inmortaƚar/A
mucarar/A
dexmusar/A
nanarar/A
nebiar/A
nikiar/A
dexnonboƚar/A
nuvoƚir/A
obligar/A
inokuƚar/A
ondiđar/A
dexordenar/A
ortrigar/A
pacolar/A
inpaɉar/A
spaƚetar/A
palpiñar/A
spanpanar/A
parer/A
parlar/A
inparsiaƚixar/A
pastexar/A
rapatumar/A
skonpaxenar/A
apeƚar/A
inpelumar/A
spénxer/A
despeñar/A
perpetrar/A
petexoƚar/A
repesar/A
repiantar/A
inpiegar/A
pinsar/A
inpirolar/A
pisegar/A
pocar/A
polveriđar/A
repóner/A
ponteƚar/A
spopolar/A
apostar/A
spovolar/A
apreŧiar/A
prontar/A
despulexar/A
putanidar/A
rafar/A
rankurar/A
rasteƚar/A
recotar/A
reƚasionar/A
ribelar/A
iriŧolar/A
roeɉar/A
romatiđar/A
inrosar/A
ruxenir/A
rumegar/A
desagrar/A
strasaƚir/A
arsaltar/A
desapunir/A
scamar/A
sedar/A
inseguir/A
inseɉar/A
insemolar/A
inseñar/A	po:verb
sèrver/A
siaƚar/A
desimilar/A
situar/A
skaoƚar/A
inskarseƚar/A
skicar/A
skortar/A
reskríver/A
soler/A
insolfar/A
insoñar/A
insosolar/A
sparpañar/A
spergosar/A
spigasar/A
spojar/A
spudar/A
instaƚar/A
statuir/A
stikar/A
stisar/A
strafuñar/A
strénđer/A
stronsar/A
studar/A
sufitar/A
susitar/A
destajar/A
tamixar/A
taraŧar/A
tartufoƚar/A
tavernar/A
perinténder/A
tenporejar/A
intrateñir/A
atéñer/A
terasar/A
tikiñar/A
intitoƚar/A
tonar/A
topar/A
tortijar/A
stòrxer/A
trabukar/A
trankuilidar/A
trateđar/A
tremar/A
trikoƚar/A
tronbixar/A
tufar/A
inŧakolar/A
ŧavarɉar/A
inŧefar/A
inŧendiar/A
desernir/A
esetuar/A
ŧigalar/A
inŧinganar/A
ŧirkondar/A
ŧolar/A
inŧukar/A
uñolar/A
usar/A
invàder/A
xvaƚivar/A
soravanŧar/A
desprovéder/A
reveƚir/A
deventar/A
kontraveñir/A
soravèñer/A
xverxelar/A
vernidar/A
dexverxenar/A
deviar/A
vinasar/A
viŧiar/A
vodar/A
‘oƚer/A
involtolar/A
vulnerar/A
xbacar/A
inxentilir/A
xɉànxer/A
xmorgolar/A
exultar/A
gàlder/A
skaretar/A
dexnoar/A
kanaliđar/A
seleŧionar/A
kekeñar/A
inganberar/A
ɉòler/A
ratar/A
xbrisolar/A
xgaƚinar/A
spedocar/A
elíder/A
